District of Columbia statutes.
6-1310

Privileges and immunities.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of the United States to carry out its international obligations, or to supersede or limit immunities otherwise available by law. No act or omission by any foreign mission, public international organization, or official mission to such an organization, in compliance with this chapter shall be deemed to be an implied waiver of any immunity otherwise provided for by law.

Aug. 24, 1982, 96 Stat. 290, Pub. L. 97-241, § 210
1981 Ed., § 5-1210.
For effective date of amendment made by title II of Pub. L. 97-241, Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-1301.